Maryland, session 2025, SB0222.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Health – General
13–4502.
(a) There is a Cannabis Public Health Advisory Council.
(b) The Advisory Council consists of the following members:
(1) One member from the Senate of Maryland, appointed by the President
of the Senate;
(2) One member from the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of
the House;
(3) The Secretary, or the Secretary’s designee;
(4) The Deputy Secretary for Behavioral Health, or the Deputy Secretary’s
designee;
(5) The Secretary of Agriculture, or the Secretary’s designee;
– 1 –

Ch. 365 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(6) The Executive Director of the [Natalie M. LaPrade Medical Cannabis
Commission] MARYLAND CANNABIS ADMINISTRATION, or the Executive Director’s
designee;
(7) The State Superintendent of Schools, or the State Superintendent’s
designee;
(8) The Executive Director of the Governor’s Office of Crime Prevention
and Policy, or the Executive Director’s designee; [and]
(9) THE ADMINISTRATOR OF THE MOTOR VEHICLE
ADMINISTRATION, OR THE ADMINISTRATOR’S DESIGNEE; AND
(10) THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR OF THE OFFICE OF SOCIAL EQUITY
IN THE MARYLAND CANNABIS ADMINISTRATION, OR THE EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR’S
DESIGNEE; AND
(11) The following members appointed by the Governor:
(i) One representative from a historically black college or
university;
(ii) One health care provider with experience in cannabis;
(iii) One pharmacist licensed in the State;
(iv) One health care provider with expertise in substance use
disorder treatment and recovery;
(v) One individual with expertise in cannabis use disorder;
(vi) One academic researcher with expertise in cannabis law and
policy;
(vii) One individual with at least 5 years of experience in health or
social equity;
(viii) One public health professional with cannabis experience; and
(ix) One representative of a laboratory that tests cannabis.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –